Utah statutes.
78A-6-505.   Contents of petition.

(1)  The petition for termination of parental rights shall include, to the best information or belief of the petitioner:

(a)  the name and place of residence of the petitioner;

(b)  the name, sex, date and place of birth, and residence of the child;

(c)  the relationship of the petitioner to the child;

(d)  the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the parents, if known;

(e)  the name and address of the person having legal custody or guardianship, or acting in loco parentis to the child, or the organization or agency having legal custody or providing care for the child;

(f)  the grounds on which termination of parental rights is sought, in accordance with Section 78A-6-507; and

(g)  the names and addresses of the persons or the authorized agency to whom legal custody or guardianship of the child might be transferred.

(2)  A copy of any relinquishment or consent, if any, previously executed by the parent or parents shall be attached to the petition.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

